California, session 20252026, SB78.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 237 is added to the Streets and Highways Code, to read:237. (a) The department shall prepare a report evaluating current efforts and potential opportunities to streamline the processes and procedures for the delivery of safety enhancement projects on the state highway system, including all of the following:(1) A review of administrative, regulatory, and procedural factors that affect the timing of safety enhancement projects.(2) An evaluation of the use and feasibility of alternative project delivery methods, such as design-build, progressive design-build, job order contracting, and construction manager/general contractor, and other innovative approaches, as determined by the department.(3) An assessment of whether the department has sufficient statutory authority to effectively use the methods evaluated pursuant to paragraph (2) for safety-specific projects, and the identification of any areas where additional authority may be needed.(4) Recommendations for enhancing interagency coordination and procurement strategies to streamline delivery of safety enhancement projects without compromising safety or transparency.(5) A summary of existing and planned department initiatives to streamline the delivery of safety enhancements.(b) The report required by this section shall be used as an informational source and shall be based only on available data.(c) The report required by this section shall not do either of the following:(1) Include project-specific findings or imply causality between delivery timelines and safety outcomes.(2) Create a new duty, right, or standard of care for the department.(d) (1) On or before January 1, 2027, the department shall submit the report required by this section to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2031.